prince/dictionaries/hu.aff
SFX i N 80
SFX i   y    nyiért       [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyiul        [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyitól       [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyit         [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyiról       [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyira        [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyinál       [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyinak       [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyiig        [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyihoz       [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyiból       [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyiban       [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyiba        [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyiakat      [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyiak        [^n]ny
SFX i   y    nyi          [^n]ny
SFX i   o    ónyiért      o
SFX i   o    ónyiul       o
SFX i   o    ónyitól      o
SFX i   o    ónyit        o
SFX i   o    ónyiról      o
SFX i   o    ónyira       o
SFX i   o    ónyinál      o
SFX i   o    ónyinak      o
SFX i   o    ónyiig       o
SFX i   o    ónyihoz      o
SFX i   o    ónyiból      o
SFX i   o    ónyiban      o
SFX i   o    ónyiba       o
SFX i   o    ónyiakat     o
SFX i   o    ónyiak       o
SFX i   o    ónyi         o
SFX i   a    ányiért      a
SFX i   a    ányiul       a
SFX i   a    ányitól      a
SFX i   a    ányit        a
SFX i   a    ányiról      a
SFX i   a    ányira       a
SFX i   a    ányinál      a
SFX i   a    ányinak      a
SFX i   a    ányiig       a
SFX i   a    ányihoz      a
SFX i   a    ányiból      a
SFX i   a    ányiban      a
SFX i   a    ányiba       a
SFX i   a    ányiakat     a
SFX i   a    ányiak       a
SFX i   a    ányi         a
SFX i   0    nyiért       [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiért       [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyiul        [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiul        [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyitól       [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyitól       [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyit         [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyit         [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyiról       [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiról       [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyira        [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyira        [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyinál       [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyinál       [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyinak       [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyinak       [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyiig        [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiig        [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyihoz       [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyihoz       [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyiból       [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiból       [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyiban       [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiban       [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyiba        [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiba        [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyiakat      [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiakat      [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyiak        [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyiak        [^aoy]
SFX i   0    nyi          [^n]y
SFX i   0    nyi          [^aoy]

SFX e Y 241
SFX e   ztik szük         sztik
SFX e   ztik szük         sztik
SFX e   ztik szétek       sztik
SFX e   ztik szétek       sztik
SFX e   ztik szék         sztik
SFX e   ztik szék         sztik
SFX e   zt   szük         szt
SFX e   zt   szétek       szt
SFX e   zt   szék         szt
SFX e   zt   szem         szt
SFX e   zt   szelek       szt
SFX e   zt   szed         szt
SFX e   zt   sze          szt
SFX e   zik  szük         szik
SFX e   zik  szük         szik
SFX e   zik  szétek       szik
SFX e   zik  szék         szik
SFX e   zik  szék         szik
SFX e   zik  szelek       szik
SFX e   zik  szed         szik
SFX e   zik  sze          szik
SFX e   zik  dzük         dzik
SFX e   zik  dzük         dzik
SFX e   zik  dzétek       dzik
SFX e   zik  dzék         dzik
SFX e   zik  dzék         dzik
SFX e   zik  dzlek        dzik
SFX e   zik  dze          dzik
SFX e   zik  dzd          dzik
SFX e   z    szék         sz
SFX e   z    dzék         dz
SFX e   tik  ssük         [üöieuoa]tik
SFX e   tik  ssétek       [üöieuoa]tik
SFX e   tik  ssék         [üöieuoa]tik
SFX e   t    ssük         [üöieuoa]t
SFX e   t    ssétek       [üöieuoa]t
SFX e   t    ssék         [üöieuoa]t
SFX e   t    ssem         [üöieuoa]t
SFX e   t    sselek       [üöieuoa]t
SFX e   t    ssed         [üöieuoa]t
SFX e   t    sse          [üöieuoa]t
SFX e   t    sd           [üöieuoa]t
SFX e   t    d            szt
SFX e   ik   zük          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik
SFX e   ik   zük          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik
SFX e   ik   zétek        [^dsbkmnyzr]zik
SFX e   ik   zétek        [^dsbkmnyzr]zik
SFX e   ik   zék          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik
SFX e   ik   zék          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik
SFX e   ik   zelek        [^dsbkmnyzr]zik
SFX e   ik   zed          [^dsbkmnyzr]zik
SFX e   ik   ze           [^ds]zik
SFX e   ik   tük          szik
SFX e   ik   tük          [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   tük          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   tétek        szik
SFX e   ik   tétek        [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   tétek        [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ték          szik
SFX e   ik   ték          [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ték          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   telek        szik
SFX e   ik   telek        [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   telek        [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ted          szik
SFX e   ik   ted          [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ted          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   te           szik
SFX e   ik   te           [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   te           [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   sük          sik
SFX e   ik   sük          sik
SFX e   ik   sük          [^szüöieuoa]tik
SFX e   ik   sétek        sik
SFX e   ik   sétek        sik
SFX e   ik   sétek        [^szüöieuoa]tik
SFX e   ik   sék          sik
SFX e   ik   sék          sik
SFX e   ik   sék          [^szüöieuoa]tik
SFX e   ik   selek        sik
SFX e   ik   sed          sik
SFX e   ik   se           sik
SFX e   ik   ném          szik
SFX e   ik   ném          [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ném          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   nélek        szik
SFX e   ik   nélek        [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   nélek        [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   néd          szik
SFX e   ik   néd          [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   néd          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   né           szik
SFX e   ik   né           [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   né           [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   lek          szik
SFX e   ik   lek          [^ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   lek          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   ik   jük          [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   jük          [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   jük          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   jük          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   jétek        [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   jétek        [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   jétek        [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   jétek        [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   jék          [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   jék          [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   jék          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   jék          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   jelek        [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   jelek        [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   jed          [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   jed          [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   je           [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   je           [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldr]ik
SFX e   ik   i            ik
SFX e   ik   ettük        [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   ettük        [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ettétek      [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   ettétek      [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ették        [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   ették        [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ettelek      [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   ettelek      [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   etted        [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   etted        [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ette         [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   ette         [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   eném         [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   eném         [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   enélek       [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   enélek       [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   enéd         [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   enéd         [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ené          [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   ené          [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   elek         [s][ld]ik
SFX e   ik   elek         [bdgjklmnrtzy][ldgrz]ik
SFX e   ik   ed           ik
SFX e   ik   d            szik
SFX e   ik   d            [^ldgrszt]ik
SFX e   ik   d            [^bdgjkmrtzys][ldrz]ik
SFX e   0    zük          z
SFX e   0    zük          z
SFX e   0    zétek        [^ds]z
SFX e   0    zék          [^ds]z
SFX e   0    zem          z
SFX e   0    zelek        z
SFX e   0    zed          z
SFX e   0    ze           z
SFX e   0    tük          [^tóúőű]
SFX e   0    tük          [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    tétek        [^tk]
SFX e   0    tétek        [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    ték          [^tk]
SFX e   0    ték          [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    telek        [^tóúőű]
SFX e   0    telek        [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    ted          [^tk]
SFX e   0    ted          [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    te           [^tk]
SFX e   0    te           [^jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    sük          s
SFX e   0    sük          s
SFX e   0    sük          [^szüöieuoa]t
SFX e   0    sétek        s
SFX e   0    sétek        [^szüöieuoa]t
SFX e   0    sék          s
SFX e   0    sék          [^szüöieuoa]t
SFX e   0    sem          s
SFX e   0    sem          [^szüöieuoa]t
SFX e   0    selek        s
SFX e   0    selek        [^szüöieuoa]t
SFX e   0    sed          s
SFX e   0    sed          [^szüöieuoa]t
SFX e   0    se           s
SFX e   0    se           [^szüöieuoa]t
SFX e   0    sd           [^szüöieuoa]t
SFX e   0    ném          [aeioöuü]t
SFX e   0    ném          [^tk]
SFX e   0    nélek        [aeioöuü]t
SFX e   0    nélek        [^tk]
SFX e   0    nék          [aeioöuü]t
SFX e   0    nék          [^tk]
SFX e   0    néd          [aeioöuü]t
SFX e   0    néd          [^tk]
SFX e   0    né           [aeioöuü]t
SFX e   0    né           [^tk]
SFX e   0    lek          [^lk]
SFX e   0    lek          [^l]l
SFX e   0    jük          [^sztk]
SFX e   0    jük          [^szk]
SFX e   0    jétek        [^sztk]
SFX e   0    jék          [^sztk]
SFX e   0    jem          [^sztk]
SFX e   0    jelek        [^sztk]
SFX e   0    jed          [^sztk]
SFX e   0    je           [^sztk]
SFX e   0    itek         [^k]
SFX e   0    ik           [^k]
SFX e   0    i            [^k]
SFX e   0    ettük        [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    ettük        [ln]l
SFX e   0    ettük        [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    ettétek      rr
SFX e   0    ettétek      [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    ettétek      [ln]l
SFX e   0    ettétek      [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    ettétek      [gn]g
SFX e   0    ették        [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    ették        [ln]l
SFX e   0    ették        [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    etted        [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    etted        [ln]l
SFX e   0    etted        [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    ette         [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    ette         [ln]l
SFX e   0    ette         [jlmnrszáéiíóöuüű]t
SFX e   0    eném         [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    eném         [ln]l
SFX e   0    eném         [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX e   0    enélek       [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    enélek       [ln]l
SFX e   0    enélek       [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX e   0    enék         [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    enék         [ln]l
SFX e   0    enék         [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX e   0    enéd         [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    enéd         [ln]l
SFX e   0    enéd         [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX e   0    ené          [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    ené          [ln]l
SFX e   0    ené          [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX e   0    em           [^k]
SFX e   0    elek         rr
SFX e   0    elek         [lnrz]d
SFX e   0    elek         [jlmnrszáéíű]t
SFX e   0    elek         [gn]g
SFX e   0    ed           [^k]
SFX e   0    d            [^dtk]
SFX e   0    d            [^d]d
